Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.019

Electronic signatures.

(1) Institutions of higher education and state higher education agencies may use or accept secure electronic signatures for any human resource, benefits, or payroll processes that require a signature. Such signatures are valid and enforceable.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process, attached to, or logically associated with, a contract or other record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

(b) "Secure electronic signature" means an electronic signature that:

(i) Is unique to the person making the signature;

(ii) Uses a technology or process to make the signature that is under the sole control of the person making the signature;

(iii) Uses a technology or process that can identify the person using the technology or process; and

(iv) Can be linked with an electronic record in such a way that it can be used to determine whether the electronic record has been changed since the electronic signature was incorporated in, attached to, or associated with the electronic record.

[ 2013 c 218 s 2.]